Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 5

Architect and/or Engineer Payment

66-34-501. Payment to architect or engineer — Governing provisions.

An architect or engineer furnishing design or contract administration services to an owner, prime contractor, or remote contractor for the improvement of real property is entitled to payment in accordance with part 2 of this chapter, if the architect or engineer contracts in writing with the owner; or in accordance with part 3 of this chapter, if the architect or engineer contracts in writing with a prime contractor or remote contractor.

Acts 1991, ch. 45, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted “and/” preceding “or engineer” throughout the section; and substituted “prime contractor, or remote contractor” for “contractor, subcontractor, materialman or furnisher” and made a similar change at the end of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.